District of Columbia statutes.
38-105

Repealed

Superintendent; appointment; term of office; duties.

Repealed.

June 20, 1906, 34 Stat. 317, ch. 3446, § 3(1)
Apr. 22, 1968, 82 Stat. 102, Pub. L. 90-292, § 3(d)
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3204(h), 25 DCR 5740
June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 1003(c), 54 DCR 4102
1973 Ed., § 31-105.
1981 Ed., § 31-107.
Textbooks and supplies, recommendations for purchase, see § 38-704.
Removal of Superintendent, see § 38-106.
Official expenses, see § 38-915.
License taxes, regulated non-health related occupations and professions, see § 47-2853.04.
Excusing children who are regularly employed from school attendance, see § 38-202.
Ceremonial expenses, see § 38-914.
Annual school census, see §§ 31-204—31-206.